Hawaii, session 2025, HB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that federally qualified health centers, rural health clinics, Ryan White HIV/AIDs program centers, and Native Hawaiian health centers are a vital source of health care access and public health for Hawaii's underserved population, serving twenty per cent of residents. Foundational health information technology infrastructure is needed to transform health care delivery and maintain public health readiness and recovery.  Certified, hosted, and maintained health information technology, including software and hardware upgrades and related technical support, are an essential component of equitable access to care, particularly in the artificial intelligence era.  Such systems enhance care coordination, improve patient outcomes, and assist providers in meeting regulatory obligations.  They also promote public health by equipping providers and government agencies with the information necessary to understand their community's needs and craft data-driven policies.  Equally important, health information technology systems that share information seamlessly are critical in supporting trauma informed care by ensuring that sensitive patient health information is interoperable among providers, thereby reducing the need to repeatedly ask questions that could be traumatic for patients. The legislature further finds that certified, hosted, and maintained health information technology infrastructure requires significant upfront investment that is not feasible for many providers in rural and underserved areas.  The resulting difference in the quality of health information technology available to providers creates disparities in care and public health outcomes in rural and underserved communities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a grant program within the department of health, to be administered by the state health planning and development agency, to support a certified, hosted, and maintained health information technology infrastructure and the implementation of interoperable health information technologies for federally qualified health centers, rural health clinics, Ryan White HIV/AIDs program centers, and Native Hawaiian health centers in Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 323D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  Health Infrastructure Grant Program §323D-     Definitions.  As used in this subpart: "Certified" means  certified under the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology's Health IT Certification Program, which includes interoperability and cybersecurity requirements pursuant to title 45 Code of Federal Regulations, part 170, subpart B. "Department" means the department of health. "Federally qualified health center" has the same meaning as in title 42 United States Code section 1396(l)(2)(B). "Hosted" means a health information technology system that is managed, maintained, and operated by an external entity through a centralized infrastructure, including but not limited to cloud-based or on-premises data centers. "Maintained" means regularly updating and ensuring compliance with current federal and state requirements. "Native Hawaiian health center" has the same meaning as in title 42 United States Code section 11711(4). "Rural health clinic" has the same meaning as in title 42 United States Code section 1396(l)(1). "Ryan White HIV/AIDs program center" means an organization that receives grant funding under title 42 United States Code section 300ff-21. §323D-     Health information technology infrastructure grant program; establishment.  There is established a certified, hosted, and maintained health information technology infrastructure grant program within the department, to be administered by the state agency.  The state agency shall receive and review grant applications and may award grants for eligible projects pursuant to the program. §323D-     Eligible projects.  The state agency may award grants to eligible applicants for eligible projects to: (1)  Acquire or upgrade certified, hosted, and maintained electronic health records systems; (2)  Procure certified, hosted, and maintained health information technology software and hardware, including digital security programs and devices; (3)  Finance installation services; and (4)  Cover ongoing technical assistance and workforce development and training. §323D-     Eligible applicants.  (a) Eligible applicants for a grant shall include: (1)  Federally qualified health centers within the State; (2)  Native Hawaiian health centers; (3)  Ryan White HIV/AIDS program centers; and (4)  Rural health clinics. (b)  An eligible applicant shall also: (1)  Be a nonprofit entity under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and (2)  Agree to support public health and serve as a clinical research participant, including conducting research regarding insured and uninsured individuals. §323D-     Applications.  (a) The state agency shall establish an annual time period to commence an open process for submission of applications for funding under the program.  The time period for submission shall be no less than sixty days. (b)  The form of the application shall be as prescribed by the state agency and shall include: (1)  Evidence demonstrating the applicant's experience and ability to plan, organize, staff, and deliver health services to underserved populations within the State; (2)  A description of the project; (3)  The number of people served by the applicant; and (4)  The total cost and timeline for completion of the project. §323D-     Rules. The state agency may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this subpart.  The rules may include reasonable oversight and reporting provisions to ensure that grant moneys are used as intended." SECTION 3.  Chapter 323D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by designating sections 323D-11 to 323D-18.6 as subpart A and inserting a title before section 323D-11 to read as follows: "A.  General Provisions." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Health information technology infrastructure grant program established pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________